Massachusetts, session 194th, H5295.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. The General Laws, as appearing in the 2024 Official Edition, are hereby
amended by inserting after chapter 93L the following chapter:
Chapter 93M. Social Media Regulations for Minors.
Section 1. (a) For the purpose of this section “social media” means a website or internet
medium that— (i) permits a person to become a registered user, establish an account, or create a
profile for the purpose of allowing users to create, share, and view user-generated content
through such an account or profile; (ii) enables 1 or more users to generate content that can be
viewed by other users of the medium; (iii) primarily serves as a medium for users to interact with
content generated by other users of the medium; and (iv) excludes online platforms, including
sites that provide primarily videoconferencing, emailing, or educational services.
(b) For the purpose of this section “child” shall mean a Massachusetts resident under the
age of 16.
of 2

(c) A social media platform shall not allow individuals to create or maintain an account
or profile if they are under the age of 16. A provider of such a platform must take reasonable
steps to prevent children who have not reached a minimum age of 16 from having accounts.
(d) For children under the age of 16 with existing social media accounts, the social media
platform shall terminate such accounts.
(e) The creation of a new social media account must be accompanied by documentation
supporting age verification to the corresponding social media platform. Documentation
supporting age verification shall consist of a birth certificate or valid government issued
identification. This shall be a one-time or non-recurring verification. A social media platform
will make reasonable attempts to verify the veracity of age and name provided in the
documentation. Social media platforms shall not retain copies of identification documents after
verification and shall not use such information for any purpose other than age verification.
(f) A verification system that has obtained personal data about a consumer from a source
other than the consumer shall be deemed in compliance with a consumer's request to delete such
data by deleting the consumer’s personal data retained by the system and not using such retained
data for any other purpose pursuant to this chapter.
(g) Immediately upon the effective date of this chapter, the attorney general shall be in
charge of compliance and may bring an action or special proceeding in the name and on behalf
of the people of the commonwealth to enjoin any violation of this chapter.
Section 2. This chapter shall take effect immediately upon its passage.
of 2